Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2813
False imprisonment; penalties; action for; limitation.

The penalties recoverable pursuant to sections 29-2801 to 29-2824 shall be recovered by the party aggrieved, his or her executors or administrators, by civil action in any court having cognizance of the same; Provided, no person shall be sued or molested for any offense against the provisions of said sections, unless within two years after the time when such offense shall have been committed; but if the party aggrieved shall then be in prison, then within two years after the decease of the person imprisoned, or his or her delivery out of prison. In every such action it shall be lawful for the defendant to plead the general issue, and give the special matter in evidence.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 365, p. 807;

R.S.1913, § 9259;

C.S.1922, § 10288;

C.S.1929, § 29-2813;

R.S.1943, § 29-2813.